Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6802
Policy.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to modernize its economic development platform in order to (1) encourage new businesses to relocate to Nebraska, (2) encourage existing businesses to remain and grow in Nebraska, (3) encourage the creation and retention of new, high-paying jobs in Nebraska, (4) attract and retain investment capital in Nebraska, (5) develop the Nebraska workforce, (6) simplify the administration of the tax incentive program created in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act for both businesses and the state, and (7) improve the transparency and accountability of such program.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 2.